Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1118.02
Licensed dental assistant; application for license; qualifications.

(1) Every applicant for a license to practice as a licensed dental assistant shall (a) have a high school diploma or its equivalent, (b) present proof of (i) graduation from an accredited dental assisting program or (ii) a minimum of one thousand five hundred hours of experience as a dental assistant during the five-year period prior to the application for a license, (c) pass the examination to become a certified dental assistant administered by the Dental Assisting National Board or an equivalent examination approved by the Board of Dentistry, (d) pass a jurisprudence examination approved by the board that is based on the Nebraska statutes, rules, and regulations governing the practice of dental assisting, and (e) complete continuing education as a condition of licensure if required by the board.

(2) Upon completion of these requirements, the department, with the recommendation of the board, shall issue the applicant a license to practice as a licensed dental assistant.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 11.